test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VV_CNJ_boodwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu - VV - boodwe :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	persnum prt     dub
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: boodweyaanh
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: boodweyan #yin could be result of y (change c1 to y1?) ... cf below
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: boodwed
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+4: boodwenid
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: boodweng
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Pl: boodweyaang
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+21Pl: boodweyang #ying could be result of y (change c1 to y1?) ... cf below
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: boodweyeg
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: boodwewaad
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: boodweyaambaanh
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: boodweymba #cons 
     #boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: boodweyamba #book #no yin, pretty sure yamba is produced -VR
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Sg: boodwepa
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+4: boodwenpa
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: boodwengba
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Pl: boodweyaangba
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+21Pl: boodweyngoba #cons, giba might be expected
     #boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+21Pl: boodweyngba #book #no ying
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: boodweyegba
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3Pl: boodwewaapa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4 #this is supposed to be changed conjunct: e-, bwaadwe
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: boodwewaane
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: boodwewne #cons
     #boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: boodwewane #book
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Sg: boodwegwenh
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+4: boodwengwenh
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: boodwengwenh
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Pl: boodwewaange
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+21Pl: boodwewngwe #no coda w-del in model
     #boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+21Pl: boodwengwe #book 
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: boodwewegwe
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3Pl: boodwewaagwenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4 
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+1Sg: boodwewaambaane
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Sg: boodwewmbane
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Sg: boodwegbane
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+4: boodwengobne
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+X: boodwengbane
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+1Pl: boodwewaangbane
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+21Pl: boodwewngobne #cons #no coda w-del
     #boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+21Pl: boodwewngobane #book #no coda w-del (w-del opt-VR)
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Pl: boodwewegbane
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Pl: boodwewaagbane
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: boodweswaanh
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: boodweswan 
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Sg: boodwesig 
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+4: boodwesnid #also snig
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: boodwesing
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Pl: boodweswaang
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+21Pl: boodweswang 
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: boodwesweg
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3Pl: boodwesgwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3 #sii forms extrapolated conservatively
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg:      [boodweswaambaanh, boodwesiiwaambaanh]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg:      [boodweswamba    , boodwesiiwmba ]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Sg:      [boodwespa       , boodwesiipa] #book only sii (possibly accidental gap -VR)
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+4:    [boodwesnipa     , boodwesiinpa] #book only sii (ditto)
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X:      [boodwesngiba    , boodwesiingba] #book only sii (ditto)
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Pl:   [boodweswaangba  , boodwesiiwaangba]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+21Pl: [boodweswangba   , boodwesiiwngoba ]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl:   [boodweswegba    , boodwesiiwegba]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3Pl:   [boodweswaapa    , boodwesiiwaapa]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4 #this is supposed to be changed conjunct??
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg:          [boodweswaane    ,  boodwesiiwaane]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg:          [boodweswane     ,  boodwesiiwne]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Sg:          [boodwesgwenh    ,  boodwesiigwenh]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+4:        [boodwesnigwenh  ,  boodwesiingwenh]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X:          [boodwesngwenh   ,  boodwesiingwenh]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Pl:       [boodweswaange   ,  boodwesiiwaange]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+21Pl:     [boodweswangwe   ,  boodwesiiwngwe ]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl:       [boodweswegwe    ,  boodwesiiwegwe]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3Pl:       [boodweswaagwenh ,  boodwesiiwaagwenh]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4 
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+1Sg:      [boodweswaambaane, boodwesiiwaambaane]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Sg:      [boodweswambne   , boodwesiiwmbane] #cons
     #boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Sg:      [boodweswmbane   , boodwesiiwmbane] #book (typo? -VR)
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Sg:      [boodwesgobne    , boodwesiigbane]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+4:    [boodwesnigbane  , boodwesiingobne] #cons
     #boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+4:    [boodwesngbane  , boodwesiingobne] #book (typo? -VR)
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+X:      [boodwesngobne   , boodwesiingbane] #expected
     #boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+X:      [boodwesngibne   , boodwesiingbane] #book (actually attested in Western dialects (nichols 1980)
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+1Pl:   [boodweswaangbane, boodwesiiwaangbane]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+21Pl: [boodweswangbane , boodwesiiwngobne ] #book ne -> nn, gibne might happen too
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Pl:   [boodweswegbane  , boodwesiiwegbane]
     boodwe+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Pl:   [boodweswaagbane , boodwesiiwaagbane]
     
